Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.330

Budgeting procedures for districts.

The superintendent of public instruction by rule and regulation shall adopt budgeting procedures for educational service districts modeled after the statutory procedures for school districts as provided in chapter 28A.505 RCW and in accordance with RCW 28A.310.340, 28A.310.350, and 28A.310.360.

[ 1990 c 33 s 285; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 30; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 20. Formerly RCW 28A.21.135.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.